District of Columbia statutes.
38-651.05

Administration of medication.

An employee or agent trained and certified pursuant to § 38-651.04 may administer medication to a student with a valid medication action plan; provided, that:

(1)

The responsible person has delivered the medication to be administered to the school;

(2)

The employee or agent is under the general supervision of licensed health practitioner; and

(3)

Except in emergency circumstances, the responsible person has administered the initial dose of a new medication.

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-107, § 6, 54 DCR 12230